Maryland, session 2026, HB0561.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment.
Italics indicate opposite chamber/conference co mm i tte e a m en dm en ts*. hb0561*

HOUSE BILL 561
Article – Education
9.5–904.
(a) There is a Maryland Child Care Credential Program.
(b) An individual may apply to the Office for a staff credential, including a child
development associate credential, or an administrator credential under this subsection.
(c) If a person pursues, obtains, or already holds an Office–approved credential,
the Office may award to the individual:
(1) An achievement bonus;
(2) A training reimbursement; or
(3) A training voucher.
(d) (1) The Governor shall appropriate $4,000,000 for the program for fiscal
year 2021.
(2) For each of fiscal years 2022 through 2024, funding for the program
shall increase by 10% over the prior fiscal year.
(3) For fiscal year 2026, the Governor shall appropriate for the program an
amount that is at least equal to the amount appropriated in fiscal year 2024.
(4) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPROPRIATE FOR THE PROGRAM AN AMOUNT THAT IS AT
LEAST EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT APPROPRIATED IN FISCAL YEAR 2024 EACH OF
FISCAL YEARS 2028 THROUGH 2030, THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPROPRIATE
$5,687,000 FOR THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.